District of Columbia statutes.
5-113.05

Notice of release of prisoners.

(a)

Whenever the Board of Parole of the District of Columbia has authorized the release of a prisoner under § 24-404, or the United States Board of Parole has authorized the release of a prisoner under § 24-406, it shall notify the Chief of Police of that fact as far in advance of the prisoner’s release as possible.

(b)

Except in cases covered by subsection (a) of this section, notice that a prisoner under sentence of 6 months or more is to be released from an institution under the management and regulation of the Director of the Department of Corrections shall be given to the Chief of Police as far in advance of the prisoner’s release as possible.

History

June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 100, ch. 159, title III, § 304

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-134.
1973 Ed., § 4-134c.